North Dakota, session 69, SB2262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new subsection to section 15.1-01-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
The council may enter a contract to conduct a study to carry out an objective of this section.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -
KINDERGARTEN THROUGH GRADE TWELVE EDUCATION COORDINATION COUNCIL
CONTRACTS. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, the sum of $60,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the
superintendent of public instruction for the purpose of paying contracts entered by the kindergarten
through grade twelve education coordination council under section 15.1-01-04, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.

S. B. NO. 2262 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2262.
Senate Vote: Yeas 41 Nays 6 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 80 Nays 13 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State